Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Solemnization

402.050.
Who may solemnize marriage — Persons present.

Marriage shall be solemnized only by:

Ministers of the gospel or priests of any denomination in regular communion with any religious society;

Justices and judges of the Court of Justice, retired justices and judges of the Court of Justice except those removed for cause or convicted of a felony, county judges/executive, and such justices of the peace and fiscal court commissioners as the Governor or the county judge/executive authorizes; or

A religious society that has no officiating minister or priest and whose usage is to solemnize marriage at the usual place of worship and by consent given in the presence of the society, if either party belongs to the society.

At least two (2) persons, in addition to the parties and the person solemnizing the marriage, shall be present at every marriage.

History.

2103, 2107: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 102; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 401, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 516, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

402.060.
Minister or priest to have license to solemnize marriage — Exemption — Special license for nonresident. [Repealed.]

402.070.
Marriage not invalid for want of authority to solemnize.

No marriage solemnized before any person professing to have authority therefor shall be invalid for the want of such authority, if it is consummated with the belief of the parties, or either of them, that he had authority and that they have been lawfully married.

History.

2102.

402.080.
Marriage license required — Who may issue.

No marriage shall be solemnized without a license therefor. The license shall be issued by the clerk of the county in which the female resides at the time, unless the female is eighteen (18) years of age or over or a widow, and the license is issued on her application in person, in which case it may be issued by any county clerk.

HISTORY:

2105: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 42; 1968, ch. 100, § 14; 1978, ch. 384, § 518, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2018 ch. 36, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

402.090.
Soliciting persons to be married by particular person — Sharing remuneration — Solicitation by minister or justice of the peace.

No person shall, for compensation or reward, solicit, persuade, entice, direct or induce any persons to go before any person authorized to solemnize marriage to be married. No such person shall receive for such services any part of the remuneration paid for solemnizing the marriage.

No person authorized to solemnize marriage shall pay, give to, or divide or share with any other person any sum of money or other thing obtained by him for solemnizing marriage.

No person authorized to solemnize marriage shall solicit, persuade, entice, direct or induce any persons to come before him to be married.

History.

2103: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 29, § 1.